North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-02 General Property Assessment
57-02-08.1.
Homestead credit.

Any person sixty-five years of age or older or permanently and totally disabled, in the year in which the tax was levied, with an income that does not exceed the limitations of subdivision c is entitled to receive a reduction in the assessment on the taxable valuation on the person’s homestead. An exemption under this subsection applies regardless of whether the person is the head of a family.

The exemption under this subsection continues to apply if the person does not reside in the homestead and the person’s absence is due to confinement in a nursing home, hospital, or other care facility, for as long as the portion of the homestead previously occupied by the person is not rented to another person.

The exemption must be determined according to the following schedule:

If the person’s income is not in excess of twenty-two thousand dollars, a reduction of one hundred percent of the taxable valuation of the person’s homestead up to a maximum reduction of five thousand six hundred twenty-five dollars of taxable valuation.

If the person’s income is in excess of twenty-two thousand dollars and not in excess of twenty-six thousand dollars, a reduction of eighty percent of the taxable valuation of the person’s homestead up to a maximum reduction of four thousand five hundred dollars of taxable valuation.

If the person’s income is in excess of twenty-six thousand dollars and not in excess of thirty thousand dollars, a reduction of sixty percent of the taxable valuation of the person’s homestead up to a maximum reduction of three thousand three hundred seventy-five dollars of taxable valuation.

If the person’s income is in excess of thirty thousand dollars and not in excess of thirty-four thousand dollars, a reduction of forty percent of the taxable valuation of the person’s homestead up to a maximum reduction of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars of taxable valuation.

If the person’s income is in excess of thirty-four thousand dollars and not in excess of thirty-eight thousand dollars, a reduction of twenty percent of the taxable valuation of the person’s homestead up to a maximum reduction of one thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars of taxable valuation.

If the person’s income is in excess of thirty-eight thousand dollars and not in excess of forty-two thousand dollars, a reduction of ten percent of the taxable valuation of the person’s homestead up to a maximum reduction of five hundred sixty-three dollars of taxable valuation.

Persons residing together, as spouses or when one or more is a dependent of another, are entitled to only one exemption between or among them under this subsection. Persons residing together, who are not spouses or dependents, who are co-owners of the property are each entitled to a percentage of a full exemption under this subsection equal to their ownership interests in the property.

This subsection does not reduce the liability of any person for special assessments levied upon any property.

Any person claiming the exemption under this subsection shall sign a verified statement of facts establishing the person’s eligibility. Any income information contained in the statement of facts is a confidential record.

A person is ineligible for the exemption under this subsection if the value of the assets of the person and any dependent residing with the person exceeds five hundred thousand dollars, including the value of any assets divested within the last three years.

The assessor shall attach the statement filed under subdivision f to the assessment sheet and shall show the reduction on the assessment sheet.

An exemption under this subsection terminates at the end of the taxable year of the death of the applicant.

Any person who would qualify for an exemption under subdivisions a and c of subsection 1 except for the fact that the person rents living quarters is eligible for refund of a portion of the person’s annual rent deemed by this subsection to constitute the payment of property tax.

For the purpose of this subsection, twenty percent of the annual rent, exclusive of any federal rent subsidy and of charges for any utilities, services, furniture, furnishings, or personal property appliances furnished by the landlord as part of the rental agreement, whether expressly set out in the rental agreement, must be considered as payment made for property tax. When any part of the twenty percent of the annual rent exceeds four percent of the annual income of a qualified applicant, the applicant is entitled to receive a refund from the state general fund for that amount in excess of four percent of the person’s annual income, but the refund may not be in excess of four hundred dollars. If the calculation for the refund is less than five dollars, a minimum of five dollars must be sent to the qualifying applicant.

Persons who reside together, as spouses or when one or more is a dependent of another, are entitled to only one refund between or among them under this subsection. Persons who reside together in a rental unit, who are not spouses or dependents, are each entitled to apply for a refund based on the rent paid by that person.

Each application for refund under this subsection must be made to the tax commissioner before the first day of June of each year by the person claiming the refund. The tax commissioner may grant an extension of time to file an application for good cause. The tax commissioner shall issue refunds to applicants.

This subsection does not apply to rents or fees paid by a person for any living quarters, including a nursing home licensed pursuant to section 23-16-01, if those living quarters are exempt from property taxation and the owner is not making a payment in lieu of property taxes.

A person may not receive a refund under this section for a taxable year in which that person received an exemption under subsection 1.

All forms necessary to effectuate this section must be prescribed, designed, and made available by the tax commissioner. The county directors of tax equalization shall make these forms available upon request.

A person whose homestead is a farm structure exempt from taxation under subsection 15 of section 57-02-08 may not receive any property tax credit under this section.

For the purposes of this section:

“Dependent” has the same meaning it has for federal income tax purposes.

“Homestead” has the same meaning as provided in section 47-18-01.

“Income” means income for the most recent complete taxable year from all sources, including the income of any dependent of the applicant, and including any county, state, or federal public assistance benefits, social security, or other retirement benefits, but excluding any federal rent subsidy, any amount excluded from income by federal or state law with the exception of income from social security benefits, and medical expenses paid during the year by the applicant or the applicant’s dependent which is not compensated by insurance or other means.

“Medical expenses” has the same meaning as it has for state income tax purposes, except that for transportation for medical care the person may use the standard mileage rate allowed for state officer and employee use of a motor vehicle under section 54-06-09.

“Permanently and totally disabled” means the inability to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment which can be expected to result in death or has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than twelve months as established by a certificate from a licensed physician or a written determination of disability from the social security administration or any federal or state agency that has authority to certify an individual’s disability.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 470, § 1; 1973, ch. 448, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, §§ 593, 673; 1975, ch. 509, § 1; 1977, ch. 510, § 1; 1977, ch. 511, § 1; 1979, ch. 589, § 2; 1979, ch. 595, § 2; 1981, ch. 562, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 36; 1983, ch. 602, § 1; 1985, ch. 604, § 2; 1985, ch. 605, § 1; 1985, ch. 606, § 1; 1985, ch. 607, § 1; 1985, ch. 608, § 1; 1989, ch. 142, § 8; 1989, ch. 693, § 1; 1989, ch. 694, § 1; 1991, ch. 649, § 1; 1993, ch. 544, § 1; 1993, ch. 545, § 1; 1999, ch. 492, § 1; 2001, ch. 507, § 1; 2003, ch. 84, § 2; 2005, ch. 546, § 1; 2005, ch. 547, § 1; 2007, ch. 520, § 1; 2007, ch. 500, § 1; 2009, ch. 528, § 1; 2013, ch. 15, § 27; 2013, ch. 443, § 4; 2013, ch. 442, § 1; 2015, ch. 433, § 6, effective January 1, 2016; 2019, ch. 474, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018; 2019, ch. 486, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

Note.

Section 57-02-08.1 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 474, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2278; and Section 1 of Chapter 486, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1174.

Collateral References.

Validity of statute or ordinance giving property tax exemption or favorable property tax rate to older persons, 45 A.L.R.3d 1147.

Construction of statute or ordinance giving property tax exemption or favorable property tax rate to older persons, 45 A.L.R.3d 1153.

57-02-08.2.
Homestead credit — Certification.

Prior to the first of March of each year, the county auditor of each county shall certify to the state tax commissioner on forms prescribed by the state tax commissioner the name and address of each person for whom the homestead credit provided for in section 57-02-08.1 was allowed for the preceding year, the amount of exemption allowed, the total of the tax mill rates of all taxing districts, exclusive of any state mill rates, that was applied to other real estate in such taxing districts for the preceding year, and such other information as may be prescribed by the tax commissioner.

On or before the first of June of each year, the tax commissioner shall audit the certifications, make the required corrections, and certify to the state treasurer for payment to each county, the sum of the amounts computed by multiplying the exemption allowed for each such homestead in the county for the preceding year by the total of the tax mill rates, exclusive of any state mill rates, that was applied to other real estate in such taxing districts for that year.

The county treasurer upon receipt of the payment from the state treasurer shall apportion and distribute it without delay to the county and to the local taxing districts of the county on the basis on which the general real estate tax for the preceding year is apportioned and distributed.

The tax commissioner shall annually certify to the state treasurer the amount computed by multiplying the exemption allowed for all homesteads in the state for the preceding year by one mill for deposit into the state medical center fund.

Supplemental certifications by the county auditor and by the state tax commissioner and supplemental payments by the state treasurer may be made after the dates prescribed in this section to make such corrections as may be necessary because of errors or because of approval of any application for abatement filed by a person because the exemption provided for in section 57-02-08.1 was not allowed in whole or in part.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 448, § 2; 1975, ch. 509, § 2; 2007, ch. 501, § 2; 2011, ch. 446, § 1.

Cross-References.

Hearing on application for abatement, requirement inapplicable, see N.D.C.C. § 57-23-06.

57-02-08.3.
Homestead credit for special assessments — Certification — Lien.

Any person who has qualified for the property tax credit provided for in section 57-02-08.1 may elect to also qualify for an additional homestead credit against that person’s homestead for the portion of any special assessment levied by a taxing district which becomes due for the same year. The total amount of credits allowed for any one property must not exceed six thousand dollars, adjusted annually on January first of each year after December 31, 2019, by the consumer price index, excluding any interest charged by the body levying the special assessment. This credit may be granted only at the election of the qualifying person. The person making the election shall do so by filing with the county auditor a claim for the special assessment credit on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner. The claim must be filed with the county auditor on or before February first of the year in which the special assessment installment thereof becomes payable. For purposes of this subsection, “consumer price index” means the percentage change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers in the midwest region as determined by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the most recent year ending December thirty-first.

By March first of each year, the county auditor of each county shall certify to the state tax commissioner, on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner, the following information:

The name and address of each person for whom the special assessment credit provided for in subsection 1 was allowed for the preceding year.

The amount of credit allowed for the special assessment installment thereof due for the preceding year.

The total amount of the special assessment credits due in each special assessment district.

Other information that the tax commissioner requires.

The tax commissioner shall audit the certifications, make such corrections as may be required, and certify to the state treasurer for payment to each county by June first of each year the sum of the amounts computed by adding the credits allowed for portions of special assessments which were due for each homestead in the county for the preceding year. No more than the portion of special assessments due for the preceding year shall be allowed as a credit for any homestead in any year.

The county treasurer upon receipt of the payment from the state treasurer shall forthwith apportion and distribute the payment to each special assessment district in the county according to the total credits allowed for each respective special assessment district.

Supplemental certifications by the county auditor and by the state tax commissioner and supplemental payments by the state treasurer may be made after the dates prescribed herein to make such corrections as may be necessary because of errors therein.

Any credit allowed under subsection 1, plus interest in the amount of six percent per year from June first of the year for which the special assessment installment for which a credit is taken becomes payable, creates a lien in favor of the state against the property upon which the special assessment credit is allowed and remains a lien upon the property from the time the credit is allowed until the lien is fully satisfied by depositing the amount of the lien in the state general fund. If the amount of the lien exceeds the market value of the property, the state may accept the amount of the market value of the property as payment in full on the lien.

Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a transfer of title to the homestead because of sale, death, or otherwise may not be made without the lien being satisfied. When a credit under subsection 1 is allowed, the county auditor shall cause a notice of lien of record to be filed against subject property with the recorder.

The recorder may not record any deed for property on which the county auditor has determined that there is an unsatisfied lien created under this section, except for a transfer between spouses because of the death of one of them as provided in paragraph 3.

When a transfer occurs between spouses because of the death of one of them, the lien allowed by this section need not be satisfied until the property is again transferred.

This lien has precedence over all other liens except general tax liens and prior special assessment liens and shall not be divested at any judicial sale. A mistake in the description of the property covered by this lien or in the name of the owner of the property does not defeat the lien if the property can be identified by the description in the special assessment list.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 563, § 1; 1983, ch. 603, § 1; 1985, ch. 609, § 1; 1993, ch. 546, § 1; 1995, ch. 548, § 1; 1997, ch. 478, § 1; 1997, ch. 479, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2005, ch. 545, § 5; 2019, ch. 475, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 475, S.L. 2019 provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to credits granted after the effective date of this Act.”

57-02-08.4.
Conditional property tax exemption for owners of wetlands.

Wetlands qualifying under this section are exempt from taxation. To qualify for the tax exemption, the owner of wetlands must annually file with the county director of tax equalization, on a form prescribed by the state tax commissioner, a legal description of the wetlands for which an exemption is claimed and an agreement to not drain, fill, pump, or concentrate water in a smaller and deeper excavation in the wetland basin or alter the physical nature of the wetland in any manner that reduces the wetland’s ability to function as a natural system during the year for which the exemption is claimed. To qualify for the exemption the agreement must be filed by June thirtieth of the year for which the exemption is claimed. The exemption is not available for years prior to filing of the agreement or for any year in which the terms of the agreement are violated. The county director of tax equalization shall certify to the county auditor, for each landowner receiving the exemption, the landowner’s name, the amount of tax which would have been due on the exempt acreage for the most recent past tax year, and that the landowner has filed the required agreement. The amount of the wetlands exemption must be reflected upon the property tax statement of each eligible taxpayer.

For purposes of this section, “wetlands” means all types 3, 4, and 5 wetlands, as determined by the agriculture commissioner and the director of the game and fish department, in accordance with United States fish and wildlife service circular no. 39 (1971 edition), drainage of which would be feasible and practical.

When wetlands are drained or altered so the land no longer qualifies for the exemption provided by this section, the land is subject to additional taxes which would have been assessed if the property had not qualified for the exemption provided by this section. The taxes which would have been due on the land without the exemption for the ten years preceding the year in which the exemption is terminated must be computed, and the property owner shall pay the difference between this amount and the taxes which were actually paid on the property in addition to taxes currently due. Absence of water on property qualifying for the exemption under this section, caused by drought conditions, does not disqualify the property from the exemption under this section.

The wetlands tax exemption provided by this section does not grant the public any additional or greater right of access to the wetlands or diminish any right of ownership to the wetlands. The owner of property exempt under this section may use the property in any manner which does not violate the agreement filed with the county director of tax equalization.

No property is exempt under this section unless the tax commissioner has certified to the county auditor of each county by December tenth of the taxable year that funds are available in the state treasury which may be used for payment in full of any state obligations under section 57-02-08.5.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 665, § 2; 1987, ch. 671, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 96; 1991, ch. 649, § 2.

57-02-08.5.
Wetlands tax exemption payment — Certification.

Prior to November first of each year, the county auditor of each county shall certify to the state tax commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner the total amount of property tax which would have been due on property exempt under section 57-02-08.4 within the county and other information as may be prescribed by the commissioner. The county auditor shall forward to the commissioner copies of all agreements described in section 57-02-08.4 in effect in the county.

The commissioner shall audit the claims for exemption, make corrections as required, and certify to the state treasurer for payment to each county on or before June thirtieth of each year the sum of property taxes due on property exempt under section 57-02-08.4 for the county in the preceding year.

The county treasurer upon receipt of the payment from the state treasurer shall apportion and distribute it to the county and local taxing districts on the basis on which the general real estate tax for the preceding year is apportioned and distributed.

Supplemental certifications by the county auditor and the state tax commissioner and supplemental payments by the state treasurer may be made after the date prescribed in this section to make corrections as may be necessary.

No certifications must be made and no apportionment or distribution of payments to political subdivisions may be made under this section unless property was exempt under section 57-02-08.4 in the preceding year.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 665, § 3; 1987, ch. 671, § 2; 1991, ch. 649, § 3.

57-02-08.6.
Authorization for receipt of funds.

The state treasurer may receive funds for the wetlands property tax exemption program by legislative appropriation and by gift, grant, devise, or bequest of any money or property from any private or public source. Funds appropriated from any source for this purpose are not subject to section 54-44.1-11, and all income and moneys derived from the investment of the funds must be credited to the fund for the wetlands property tax exemption program. The director of the game and fish department, the agriculture commissioner, and the director of the department of water resources shall work with the governor, the United States fish and wildlife service, nonprofit conservation organizations, and any other public official or private organization or citizen to develop a source of funding to implement sections 57-02-08.4 and 57-02-08.5.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 665, § 4; 1991, ch. 231, § 97; 2019, ch. 54, § 10, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 24, effective August 1, 2021.

57-02-08.7.
License fee in lieu of property taxes on leases for tourism or concession purposes.

Payment of the license fee as provided in this section by the lessee of any leasehold interest in state-owned property leased from the director of the state historical society or the director of the parks and recreation department is a payment in lieu of all ad valorem taxes on the leasehold interest or any associated building or other improvement if the lessee uses the property, building, or other improvement primarily for tourism or concession purposes. The director of the state historical society or the director of the parks and recreation department shall establish the license fee at an annual amount not less than one dollar and not more than one percent of the gross receipts from the tourism or concession enterprise. The lessee shall pay the license fee to the treasurer of the county in which the tourism or concession enterprise is located and all fees received under this section must be deposited in the county general fund. The lease must indicate that the director of the state historical society or the director of the parks and recreation department approves use of the property primarily for tourism or concession purposes and intends the license fee paid by the lessee to be in lieu of ad valorem taxes.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 650, § 1; 1993, ch. 80, § 35; 2001, ch. 503, § 56.

57-02-08.8.
Property tax credit for disabled veterans — Certification — Distribution. [Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020]

A disabled veteran of the United States armed forces with an armed forces service-connected disability of fifty percent or greater or a disabled veteran who has an extra-schedular rating to include individual unemployability that brings the veteran’s total disability rating to one hundred percent as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs, who was discharged under honorable conditions or who has been retired from the armed forces of the United States, or the unremarried surviving spouse if the disabled veteran is deceased, is eligible for a credit applied against the first eight thousand one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of the homestead owned and occupied by the disabled veteran or unremarried surviving spouse equal to the percentage of the disabled veteran’s disability compensation rating for service-connected disabilities as certified by the department of veterans’ affairs for the purpose of applying for a property tax credit. An unremarried surviving spouse who is receiving department of veterans’ affairs dependency and indemnity compensation receives a one hundred percent credit as described in this subsection.

If two disabled veterans are married to each other and living together, their combined credits may not exceed one hundred percent of eight thousand one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of the homestead. If a disabled veteran co-owns the homestead property with someone other than the disabled veteran’s spouse, the credit is limited to that disabled veteran’s interest in the homestead, to a maximum amount calculated by multiplying eight thousand one hundred dollars of taxable valuation by the disabled veteran’s percentage of interest in the homestead property and multiplying the result by the applicant’s certified disability percentage.

A disabled veteran or unremarried surviving spouse claiming a credit under this section for the first time shall file with the county auditor an affidavit showing the facts required under this section, a description of the property, and a certificate from the United States department of veterans’ affairs, or its successor, certifying to the amount of the disability. The affidavit and certificate must be open for public inspection. A person shall thereafter furnish to the assessor or other assessment officials, when requested to do so, any information which supports the claim for credit for any subsequent year.

For purposes of this section, and except as otherwise provided in this section, “homestead” has the meaning provided in section 47-18-01 except that it also applies to a person who otherwise qualifies under the provisions of this section whether the person is the head of the family.

This section does not reduce the liability of a person for special assessments levied upon property.

A credit under this section terminates at the end of the taxable year of the death of the applicant.

The board of county commissioners may cancel the portion of unpaid taxes that represents the credit calculated in accordance with this section for any year in which the qualifying owner has held title to the homestead property. Cancellation of taxes for any year before enactment of this section must be based on the law that was in effect for that tax year.

Before the first of March of each year, the county auditor of each county shall certify to the tax commissioner on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner the name and address of each person for whom the property tax credit for homesteads of disabled veterans was allowed for the preceding year, the amount of credit allowed, the total of the tax mill rates of all taxing districts, exclusive of any state mill rates, that was applied to other real estate in the taxing districts for the preceding year, and such other information as may be prescribed by the tax commissioner.

On or before the first of June of each year, the tax commissioner shall audit the certifications, make the required corrections, and certify to the state treasurer for payment to each county the sum of the amounts computed by multiplying the credit allowed for each homestead of a disabled veteran in the county by the total of the tax mill rates, exclusive of any state mill rates that were applied to other real estate in the taxing districts for the preceding year.

The county treasurer upon receipt of the payment from the state treasurer shall apportion and distribute the payment without delay to the county and to the local taxing districts of the county on the basis on which the general real estate tax for the preceding year is apportioned and distributed.

On or before the first day of June of each year, the tax commissioner shall certify to the state treasurer the amount computed by multiplying the property tax credit allowed under this section for homesteads of disabled veterans in the state for the preceding year by one mill for deposit in the state medical center fund.

Supplemental certifications by the county auditor and by the tax commissioner and supplemental payments by the state treasurer may be made after the dates prescribed in this section to make such corrections as may be necessary because of errors or because of approval of an application for abatement filed by a person because the credit provided for the homestead of a disabled veteran was not allowed in whole or in part.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 529, § 1; 2011, ch. 446 § 2; 2011, ch. 447, § 3; 2013, ch. 444, § 1; 5015, ch. 436, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2021, ch. 461, § 1, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020.

57-02-09.
Basis of exemptions.

The exemptions provided for in section 57-02-08 must be made in each case on the basis of the full cash valuation both of the exemption and of the property upon which such exemption is allowed.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 223, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 2078a1; R.C. 1943, § 57-0209.

57-02-10.
Inundated and highway easement lands exempt from taxation.

The board of county commissioners is authorized and directed to remove from the tax rolls and to declare as exempt from taxation all inundated lands upon which the owner thereof has granted or hereafter shall grant a permanent easement to the United States of America, its instrumentalities, or agencies, for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and operating water or wildlife conservation projects, and all lands upon which the owner thereof has granted or hereafter shall grant an easement for a highway or road right of way to the United States, its instrumentalities or agencies, or to the state or its political subdivisions, and such lands so removed from the tax rolls shall remain exempt until such time as such water or wildlife conservation projects or highway shall have been abandoned. Such lands shall not be removed from the tax rolls and declared exempt from taxation until such time as the construction of such water or wildlife conservation projects or highway thereon shall have been completed.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 270, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-0210; S.L. 1955, ch. 316, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-0210.

57-02-11.
Listing of property — Assessment thereof.

Certified assessment officials must list and assess property as follows:

All real property subject to taxation must be listed and assessed every year with reference to its value, on February first of that year.

An individual property record must be kept by the appropriate assessment official for each parcel of taxable property. The record may be in electronic or paper form and must include identifying information as prescribed by the state supervisor of assessments. Assessors shall prepare the records and provide copies of all property records prepared by the assessor to the county director of tax equalization. The county director of tax equalization shall maintain those records for ten years from the date the records were received from the assessors. A city with an assessor who holds a current certification as a class I assessor under section 57-02-01.1, and which has been determined by the state supervisor of assessments to have enough sales for an adequate sales ratio study, may elect to maintain the records required under this subsection on behalf of the county. A city that makes this election must include these records in a city database of taxable property to be maintained in the office of city assessor for ten years from the assessment date.

Whenever after the first day of February and before the first day of April in any year, it is made to appear to the assessor by the oath of the owner that any building, structure, or other improvement, or tangible personal property, which is listed for taxation for the current year has been destroyed or damaged by fire, flood, tornado, or other natural disaster, the assessor shall investigate the matter and deduct from the valuation of the property of the owner of such destroyed property an amount which in the assessor’s judgment fairly represents such deduction as should be made.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 6; R.C. 1899, § 1181; R.C. 1905, § 1486; C.L. 1913, § 2093; S.L. 1917, ch. 228, § 1; 1925, ch. 205, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2093; S.L. 1939, ch. 229, § 1; 1941, ch. 280, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-0211; S.L. 1969, ch. 475, § 3; 1971, ch. 537, § 1; 1973, ch. 449, § 1; 1977, ch. 512, § 1; 1981, ch. 564, § 6; 1983, ch. 598, § 3; 1991, ch. 649, § 4; 2011, ch. 446, § 3; 2011, ch. 441, § 3; 2017, ch. 412, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Taxation of air carrier property in lieu of registration fees, N.D.C.C. § 57-32-01.1.

57-02-11.1.
Townhouses — Common areas — Assessment and taxation.

Townhouse property must be classified and valued as is other property except that the value of the townhouse property must be increased by the value added by the right to use any common areas in connection with the townhouse development. The common areas of the development may not be separately taxed. The value of a common area of the townhouse development must be assessed in an equal amount to each townhouse in the development unless a declaration setting out a different apportionment is recorded in the office of the county recorder. The total value of the townhouse property, including the value added as provided herein, must have the benefit of any homestead credit under section 57-02-08.1 or other special classification if the townhouse otherwise qualifies.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 446, § 2; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Collateral References.

Real estate taxation of condominiums, 71 A.L.R.3d 952.

57-02-11.2.
Confidentiality of information provided by commercial property owners for assessment purposes.

Unless directed otherwise by judicial order or as otherwise provided by law, records and information provided by the owner or occupant of commercial property with regard to income and expenses of the property in connection with an assessment are confidential. This section does not prohibit the publication of statistics classified to prevent the identification of a particular property and information relating to that property or the disclosure of the records or information when an action or proceeding has been brought by the owner or occupant to set aside or review the assessment.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 493, § 1.

57-02-12.
Manner of listing personal property. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 598, § 25.

57-02-13.
False list under oath — Perjury. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

57-02-14.
Valuation of real property exempt from taxation.

At the time of making the assessment of real property, the assessor shall enter in a separate list each description of property exempt by law and shall value it in the same manner as other property, designating in each case to whom such property belongs and for what purpose used. This section does not apply to property of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state or farm buildings or farm residences exempt from property taxes by law.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 102; R.C. 1899, § 1285; R.C. 1905, § 1604; C.L. 1913, § 2219; S.L. 1933, ch. 260, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-0214; S.L. 1987, ch. 73, § 35; 1999, ch. 494, § 1.

Collateral References.

Property tax: effect of tax-exempt lessor’s reversionary interest on valuation of nonexempt lessee’s interest, 57 A.L.R.4th 950.

57-02-14.1.
Tax exemption certificate for real property to be filed — Exceptions.

Any person, corporations, limited liability companies, associations, or organizations owning real property located within a municipality which claims that such real property is exempt from assessment and taxation shall file with the assessor and with the county auditor a certificate setting out all facts on which the claim for exemption is based, including the names of owners, the date such property was acquired, the legal description, the use to which the property was put during the twelve months preceding the assessment date, and any other information which the assessor may request. This certificate shall be filed with the assessor and the county auditor each year before the assessment date. If the certificate is not filed as provided herein, the assessor shall regard the property as nonexempt property and shall assess it as such. The provisions of this section shall not apply in any case when the real property is owned by the United States or the state of North Dakota or any of its departments, institutions, agencies, or political subdivisions.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 422, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

57-02-15.
Place of listing personal property.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, or by the constitution, all taxable tangible personal property shall be assessed in the county, city, township, or district in which it is situated. Moneyed capital within the meaning of 12 U.S.C. 548 and such other moneys and credits as hereafter may be made taxable, including stocks and bonds other than bank stock, shall be listed and assessed against the owner thereof at the owner’s place of business, and, if a corporation or limited liability company, at its principal place of business, and if there is no principal place of business or office in this state, then such personal property shall be listed in the assessment district in which the business of the corporation, limited liability company, or person is carried on.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 8; R.C. 1899, § 1183; R.C. 1905, § 1488; C.L. 1913, § 2095; S.L. 1917, ch. 229, § 1; 1919, ch. 229, § 1; 1919 Sp., ch. 68, § 1; 1925, ch. 206, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 2095; R.C. 1943, § 57-0215; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Note.

As amended, 12 USCS § 548 no longer refers to “moneyed capital”.

57-02-16.
Nonresident’s farm property. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 375, § 6.

57-02-17.
Listing of personal property moved between April first and June first. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 558, § 2.

57-02-18.
Listing of range stock. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 538, § 1.

57-02-18.1.
Taxation of livestock after thirty days. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 538, § 1.

57-02-18.2.
Livestock tax proration after April first. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 538, § 1.

57-02-18.3.
Livestock list submitted to auditor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 538, § 1.

57-02-18.4.
Livestock assessment by auditor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 538, § 1.

57-02-18.5.
Notice to auditor of livestock movement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 538, § 1.

57-02-18.6.
Livestock tax collectible where danger of movement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 538, § 1.

57-02-18.7.
Effect of prior livestock assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 538, § 1.

57-02-19.
Assessment of oil and gas drilling equipment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 309, § 1.